src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-hereqka_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - herẽka: # Noun pg 2016: 86 'eng blood, pt sangue' - partial paradigm
# Perfect aspect
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: nỹerẽka # my blood
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: pỹerẽka # your(sg) blood
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3M: ỹerẽka # his bloods
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3F: ũerẽka # her bloods
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ãerẽka # our blood
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: hỹerẽka # your(pl) blood
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl3M: ỹerẽkana # their blood
     herẽka+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl3F: ũerẽkana # their blood

# p18 reader < 
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: nykywy # my head
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: pykywy # your(sg) head
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3M: ykywy # his heads
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxSg3F: ukywy # her heads
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: akywy # our head
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: hỹkywy # your(pl) head
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl3M: ykywyna # their head
     kywĩtxi+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+PxPl3F: ukywyna # their head
